Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 1. Requirements for Marriage.

Collateral references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d, Annulment of Marriage, § 1 et seq.

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Marriage, §§ 9-92.

Proofs: common law marriage, 3 Am. Jur. POF, pp. 269-297; marriage, 7 Am. Jur. POF, pp. 617-644.

55 C.J.S. Marriage, §§ 1, 9 et seq.

Liability of one putative spouse to other for wrongfully inducing entry into or cohabitation under illegal, void, or nonexistent marriage, 72 ALR2d 956.

Marriage between persons of the same sex, 63 ALR3d 1199.

Recognition by foreign state of marriage which, though invalid where contracted, would have been valid if contracted within foreign state, 82 ALR3d 1240.

Sec. 25.05.010.
Marriage a civil contract. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.011.
Civil contract.

Marriage is a civil contract entered into by one man and one woman that requires both a license and solemnization. The man and the woman must each be at least one of the following:

18 years of age or older and otherwise capable;

qualified for a license under AS

25.05.171

; or

a member of the armed forces of the United States while on active duty.

A person may not be joined in marriage in this state until a license has been obtained for that purpose as provided in this chapter. A marriage performed in this state is not valid without solemnization as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 9 ch 245 SLA 1970; am § 92 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1996)

Sec. 25.05.013.
Same-sex marriages.

A marriage entered into by persons of the same sex, either under common law or under statute, that is recognized by another state or foreign jurisdiction is void in this state, and contractual rights granted by virtue of the marriage, including its termination, are unenforceable in this state.

A same-sex relationship may not be recognized by the state as being entitled to the benefits of marriage.

History.

(§ 2 ch 21 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision on marriage, see art. I, sec. 25, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 21, SLA 1996 provides that this section “applies to all marriages entered into in other jurisdictions, whether entered into before, on, or after May 7, 1996.”

Sec. 25.05.020.
Prohibited marriages. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.021.
Prohibited marriages.

Marriage is prohibited and void if performed when

either party to the proposed marriage has a husband or wife living; or

the parties to the proposed marriage are more closely related to each other than the fourth degree of consanguinity, whether of the whole or half blood, computed according to rules of the civil law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Cross references. —

For criminal provisions prohibiting unlawful marrying, see AS

11.51.140

; for provisions declaring incestuous or bigamous marriages void, see AS

25.24.020

.

Sec. 25.05.030.
Voidable marriages. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.031.
Voidable marriages.

If either party to a marriage is incapable of consenting to it at the time of the marriage for want of marriageable age of consent or sufficient understanding, or if the consent of either party is obtained by force or fraud, or if either party fails to consummate the marriage, the marriage is voidable but only at the suit of the party under the disability or upon whom the force or fraud is imposed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 3 SLA 1974)

Cross references. —

For provisions specifying what marriages may be declared void, see AS

25.24.030

.

Sec. 25.05.040.
Matters insufficient to render marriages void. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.041.
Matters insufficient to render marriage voidable.

If a marriage is in other respects lawful and is consummated with the full belief on the part of the persons married, or either of them, that they have been lawfully joined in marriage, then the marriage is not voidable for any of the following reasons:

the licensing officer did not have jurisdiction to issue the license;

there was an omission, informality, or irregularity of form in the application for the license or in the license itself;

either or both witnesses to the marriage were incompetent;

the marriage was solemnized after the expiration date of the license;

there were no witnesses to the marriage if the valid license was issued and if the solemnization of the marriage can be otherwise proven.

If a license has been issued and the marriage solemnized as provided in this chapter and the parties to it have immediately thereafter assumed the habit and repute of husband and wife and have continued to cohabit as husband and wife for one year or until the death of either of them, the marriage shall not be void or voidable solely on the ground the license cannot be produced.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.050.
Effect of existing former marriage. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.051.
Effect of existing former marriage.

If, during the lifetime of a husband or wife with whom a marriage is still in force, a person remarries and the parties to the subsequent marriage live together as husband and wife, and one of the parties to the subsequent marriage believes in good faith that the former husband or wife is dead or that the former marriage has been annulled or dissolved by a divorce or is without knowledge of the former marriage, then after the death or divorce of the other party to the former marriage, if they continue to live together as husband and wife in good faith on the part of one of them, they are legally married from the time of removal of the impediment, and the issue of the subsequent marriage are the legitimate issue of both parents, whether born before or after the removal of the impediment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.060.
Physician’s certificate. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.061.
Marriage without license.

A marriage contracted after January 1, 1964, is void unless a license has first been obtained as provided in this chapter. If the parties to a marriage void for failure to obtain a license validate the marriage by complying with the requirements of this chapter, the issue of the void marriage are legitimate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Administrative Code. —

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

Validity of solemnized marriage as affected by absence of license required by statute, 61 ALR2d 847.

Sec. 25.05.070.
Certificate to be accompanied by laboratory report. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]